Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-616 Special administrator;
appointed informally; powers and duties. A special administrator
appointed by the registrar in informal proceedings pursuant to section
560:3-614(1) has the duty to collect and manage the assets of the estate, to
preserve them, to account therefor, and to deliver them to the general personal
representative upon qualification. The special administrator has the power of
a personal representative under this chapter necessary to perform the special
administrator's duties. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next